Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5222YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2028 Section 1. RECIPROCAL TAX AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE OF 1 WISCONSIN ââ STUDY. 2 1. Due to numerous residents of this state employed in 3 the state of Wisconsin and conversely numerous residents of 4 the state of Wisconsin employed in this state, and for the 5 mutual benefit of this state and the state of Wisconsin, the 6 department of revenue is directed to study the feasibility 7 of entering into a reciprocal tax agreement with the tax 8 administration agencies of the state of Wisconsin that adheres 9 to the conditions established in section 422.8, subsection 4. 10 2. By December 1, 2026, the department of revenue shall 11 report to the general assembly the findings of the study, 12 including the reasons the reciprocal tax agreement is feasible 13 or not feasible. If a reciprocal tax agreement is determined 14 to be feasible and mutually beneficial by this state and the 15 state of Wisconsin, the department of revenue shall submit 16 the proposed reciprocal tax agreement in bill form to the 17 legislative services agency prior to the 2027 regular session 18 of the Ninety-second General Assembly for authorization and 19 approval as required by section 422.8, subsection 4. 20 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22